Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1607 Construction cost component
impact fee; determining the amount of the fee. (a) The construction cost
component impact fees shall be calculated using the following factors:

(1) For new school construction, the cost per student
for each school type (elementary, middle or intermediate, and high school)
shall be based on the ten-year average construction of a new school facility
using the Honolulu assessment district in 2006 as the base. Costs for
construction completed earlier than 2006 shall be escalated to 2006 using the
engineering news-record construction cost index;

(2) For expansion of existing school facilities, the
cost per student for each school type (elementary, middle or intermediate, and
high school) is based on the ten-year average construction of whatever
components are required to expand the school using the Honolulu assessment
district in 2006 as the base;

(3) The cost per student in other assessment
districts shall be the cost per student in the Honolulu assessment district multiplied
by the appropriate cost factor in subsection (d). At least every three years,
the department shall update the cost per student based on the construction of a
new permanent school facility, and present the written analysis to the board
for review; and

(4) Student generation rates, as defined in section
302A-1602.

(b) The student generation rate for each
school type (elementary, middle or intermediate, and high school) shall be
multiplied by the cost per student for each school type (elementary, middle or
intermediate, and high school) to determine the cost per dwelling unit in the
development.

(c) The construction cost component impact fee
shall be based on recent public school construction costs. The 1997 to 2007
period school construction costs per student, adjusted for both the year 2007
and for the Honolulu assessment district, are as follows:

(1) Elementary schools: $35,357 per student;

(2) Middle and intermediate schools: $36,097 per
student; and

(3) High schools: $64,780 per student.

The costs per student for other assessment districts
shall be determined by multiplying the Honolulu assessment district costs per
student by the applicable cost factor in subsection (d). These costs per
student shall be updated at least every three years, pursuant to the provisions
in section 302A-1612.

(d) The State shall be divided into the
following twenty-six geographically limited cost districts, and the cost
factors listed for each cost district shall be applied to the calculation of
school construction costs per unit pursuant to subsection (c):

Cost District School District Cost
Factor

Honolulu Honolulu 1.00

Ewa Leeward/Central 1.00

Wahiawa Central 1.05

Waialua Central 1.10

Koolaupoko Windward 1.00

Koolauloa Windward 1.00

Waianae Leeward 1.10

Hilo Hawaii 1.15

Puna Hawaii 1.20

Kona Hawaii 1.20

Hamakua Hawaii 1.20

South Kohala Hawaii 1.20

North Kohala Hawaii 1.25

Pohakuloa Hawaii 1.25

Kau Hawaii 1.30

Wailuku Maui 1.15

Makawao Maui 1.25

Lahaina Maui 1.30

Hana Maui 1.35

Molokai Molokai 1.30

Lanai Lanai 1.35

Lihue Kauai 1.15

Koloa Kauai 1.20

Kawaihau Kauai 1.20

Waimea Kauai 1.25

Hanalei Kauai 1.25

(e) At least every three years, and concurrent
with any update of the costs per student, the department shall update the revenue
credits and present the written analysis to the board for review. The
calculation of revenue credits shall be reviewed and calculated recognizing
that the impact fee shall be set at one hundred per cent of the fair market
value of the land and ten per cent of the total school construction cost.

(f) The construction cost component of the
impact fees per dwelling unit shall be ten per cent of the amounts calculated
according to the following formula:

Cost
per dwelling unit from subsection (b) minus any amount by which the revenue
credit per dwelling unit from subsection (e) exceeds ninety per cent of the per
unit construction cost.

(g) The amount of the fee shall be adjusted
from the date it was determined to the date it is paid using the engineering
news-record construction cost index, or an equivalent index if that index is
discontinued.

(h) Any new residential development shall be
required to obtain a written agreement executed between the owner or developer
of the property and the department, prior to the issuance of a building permit,
under which the owner or developer has agreed to a time specified for payment
of its construction cost component impact fee. [L 2007, c 245, pt of §2; am L
2010, c 188, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next